Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Article 3. Additional State Retirement and Disability Benefits.

§ 25-11-101.
Public employees’ retirement system established.

A retirement system is hereby established and placed under the management of the board of trustees for the purpose of providing retirement allowances and other benefits under the provisions of this article for officers and employees in the state service and their beneficiaries. The retirement system provided by this article shall go into operation as of the first day of the month following the effective date thereof, when contributions by members shall begin and benefits shall become payable.

This system shall be an agency of the State of Mississippi having all the powers and privileges of a public corporation and shall be known as the “Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi.” By such name all of its business shall be transacted, all of its funds invested, and all of its cash and securities and other property held; but in ordinary correspondence the word “system” may be used instead of the full title. After appropriation for administrative expenses and after payment of investment management fees and costs, all funds of the system shall be held in trust in the custody of the board of trustees as funds of the beneficiaries of the trust. The Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review is hereby authorized and directed to have performed random actuarial evaluations, as necessary, of the funds and expenses of the Public Employees’ Retirement System and to make annual reports to the Legislature on the financial soundness of the system.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-11; Laws, 1952, ch. 299, § 11; Laws, 1989, ch. 513, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1989).

§ 25-11-103.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases as used in Articles 1 and 3, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, have the following meanings:

“Accumulated contributions” means the sum of all the amounts deducted from the compensation of a member and credited to his or her individual account in the annuity savings account, together with regular interest as provided in Section 25-11-123.

“Actuarial cost” means the amount of funds presently required to provide future benefits as determined by the board based on applicable tables and formulas provided by the actuary.

“Actuarial equivalent” means a benefit of equal value to the accumulated contributions, annuity or benefit, as the case may be, when computed upon the basis of such mortality tables as adopted by the board of trustees, and regular interest.

“Actuarial tables” mean such tables of mortality and rates of interest as adopted by the board in accordance with the recommendation of the actuary.

“Agency” means any governmental body employing persons in the state service.

“Average compensation” means the average of the four (4) highest years of earned compensation reported for an employee in a fiscal or calendar year period, or combination thereof that do not overlap, or the last forty-eight (48) consecutive months of earned compensation reported for an employee. The four (4) years need not be successive or joined years of service. In computing the average compensation for retirement, disability or survivor benefits, any amount lawfully paid in a lump sum for personal leave or major medical leave shall be included in the calculation to the extent that the amount does not exceed an amount that is equal to thirty (30) days of earned compensation and to the extent that it does not cause the employee’s earned compensation to exceed the maximum reportable amount specified in paragraph (k) of this section; however, this thirty-day limitation shall not prevent the inclusion in the calculation of leave earned under federal regulations before July 1, 1976, and frozen as of that date as referred to in Section 25-3-99. In computing the average compensation, no amounts shall be used that are in excess of the amount on which contributions were required and paid, and no nontaxable amounts paid by the employer for health or life insurance premiums for the employee shall be used. If any member who is or has been granted any increase in annual salary or compensation of more than eight percent (8%) retires within twenty-four (24) months from the date that the increase becomes effective, then the board shall exclude that part of the increase in salary or compensation that exceeds eight percent (8%) in calculating that member’s average compensation for retirement purposes. The board may enforce this provision by rule or regulation. However, increases in compensation in excess of eight percent (8%) per year granted within twenty-four (24) months of the date of retirement may be included in the calculation of average compensation if satisfactory proof is presented to the board showing that the increase in compensation was the result of an actual change in the position held or services rendered, or that the compensation increase was authorized by the State Personnel Board or was increased as a result of statutory enactment, and the employer furnishes an affidavit stating that the increase granted within the last twenty-four (24) months was not contingent on a promise or agreement of the employee to retire. Nothing in Section 25-3-31 shall affect the calculation of the average compensation of any member for the purposes of this article. The average compensation of any member who retires before July 1, 1992, shall not exceed the annual salary of the Governor.

“Beneficiary” means any person entitled to receive a retirement allowance, an annuity or other benefit as provided by Articles 1 and 3. The term “beneficiary” may also include an organization, estate, trust or entity; however, a beneficiary designated or entitled to receive monthly payments under an optional settlement based on life contingency or under a statutory monthly benefit may only be a natural person. In the event of the death before retirement of any member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, and whose spouse and/or children are not entitled to a retirement allowance on the basis that the member has less than four (4) years of membership service credit, or who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, and whose spouse and/or children are not entitled to a retirement allowance on the basis that the member has less than eight (8) years of membership service credit, and/or has not been married for a minimum of one (1) year or the spouse has waived his or her entitlement to a retirement allowance under Section 25-11-114, the lawful spouse of a member at the time of the death of the member shall be the beneficiary of the member unless the member has designated another beneficiary after the date of marriage in writing, and filed that writing in the office of the executive director of the board of trustees. No designation or change of beneficiary shall be made in any other manner.

“Board” means the board of trustees provided in Section 25-11-15 to administer the retirement system created under this article.

“Creditable service” means “prior service,” “retroactive service” and all lawfully credited unused leave not exceeding the accrual rates and limitations provided in Section 25-3-91 et seq., as of the date of withdrawal from service plus “membership service” and other service for which credit is allowable as provided in Section 25-11-109. Except to limit creditable service reported to the system for the purpose of computing an employee’s retirement allowance or annuity or benefits provided in this article, nothing in this paragraph shall limit or otherwise restrict the power of the governing authority of a municipality or other political subdivision of the state to adopt such vacation and sick leave policies as it deems necessary.

“Child” means either a natural child of the member, a child that has been made a child of the member by applicable court action before the death of the member, or a child under the permanent care of the member at the time of the latter’s death, which permanent care status shall be determined by evidence satisfactory to the board. For purposes of this paragraph, a natural child of the member is a child of the member that is conceived before the death of the member.

“Earned compensation” means the full amount earned during a fiscal year by an employee not to exceed the employee compensation limit set pursuant to Section 401(a)(17) of the Internal Revenue Code for the calendar year in which the fiscal year begins and proportionately for less than one (1) year of service. Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the value of maintenance furnished to an employee shall not be included in earned compensation. Earned compensation shall not include any amounts paid by the employer for health or life insurance premiums for an employee. Earned compensation shall be limited to the regular periodic compensation paid, exclusive of litigation fees, bond fees, performance-based incentive payments, and other similar extraordinary nonrecurring payments. In addition, any member in a covered position, as defined by Public Employees’ Retirement System laws and regulations, who is also employed by another covered agency or political subdivision shall have the earnings of that additional employment reported to the Public Employees’ Retirement System regardless of whether the additional employment is sufficient in itself to be a covered position. In addition, computation of earned compensation shall be governed by the following:

In the case of constables, the net earnings from their office after deduction of expenses shall apply, except that in no case shall earned compensation be less than the total direct payments made by the state or governmental subdivisions to the official.

In the case of chancery or circuit clerks, the net earnings from their office after deduction of expenses shall apply as expressed in Section 25-11-123(f)(4).

In the case of members of the State Legislature, all remuneration or amounts paid, except mileage allowance, shall apply.

The amount by which an eligible employee’s salary is reduced under a salary reduction agreement authorized under Section 25-17-5 shall be included as earned compensation under this paragraph, provided this inclusion does not conflict with federal law, including federal regulations and federal administrative interpretations under the federal law, pertaining to the Federal Insurance Contributions Act or to Internal Revenue Code Section 125 cafeteria plans.

Compensation in addition to an employee’s base salary that is paid to the employee under the vacation and sick leave policies of a municipality or other political subdivision of the state that employs him or her that exceeds the maximums authorized by Section 25-3-91 et seq. shall be excluded from the calculation of earned compensation under this article.

The maximum salary applicable for retirement purposes before July 1, 1992, shall be the salary of the Governor.

Nothing in Section 25-3-31 shall affect the determination of the earned compensation of any member for the purposes of this article.

The value of maintenance furnished to an employee before July 1, 2013, for which the proper amount of employer and employee contributions have been paid, shall be included in earned compensation. From and after July 1, 2013, the value of maintenance furnished to an employee shall be reported as earned compensation only if the proper amount of employer and employee contributions have been paid on the maintenance and the employee was receiving maintenance and having maintenance reported to the system as of June 30, 2013. The value of maintenance when not paid in money shall be fixed by the employing state agency, and, in case of doubt, by the board of trustees as defined in Section 25-11-15.

Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the value of any in-kind benefits provided by the employer shall not be included in earned compensation. As used in this subparagraph, “in-kind benefits” shall include, but not be limited to, group life insurance premiums, health or dental insurance premiums, nonpaid major medical and personal leave, employer contributions for social security and retirement, tuition reimbursement or educational funding, day care or transportation benefits.

“Employee” means any person legally occupying a position in the state service, and shall include the employees of the retirement system created under this article.

“Employer” means the State of Mississippi or any of its departments, agencies or subdivisions from which any employee receives his or her compensation.

“Executive director” means the secretary to the board of trustees, as provided in Section 25-11-15(9), and the administrator of the Public Employees’ Retirement System and all systems under the management of the board of trustees. Wherever the term “Executive Secretary of the Public Employees’ Retirement System” or “executive secretary” appears in this article or in any other provision of law, it shall be construed to mean the Executive Director of the Public Employees’ Retirement System.

“Fiscal year” means the period beginning on July 1 of any year and ending on June 30 of the next succeeding year.

“Medical board” means the board of physicians or any governmental or nongovernmental disability determination service designated by the board of trustees that is qualified to make disability determinations as provided for in Section 25-11-119.

“Member” means any person included in the membership of the system as provided in Section 25-11-105. For purposes of Sections 25-11-103, 25-11-105, 25-11-109, 25-11-111, 25-11-113, 25-11-114, 25-11-115 and 25-11-117, if a member of the system withdrew from state service and received a refund of the amount of the accumulated contributions to the credit of the member in the annuity savings account before July 1, 2007, and the person reenters state service and becomes a member of the system again on or after July 1, 2007, and repays all or part of the amount received as a refund and interest in order to receive creditable service for service rendered before July 1, 2007, the member shall be considered to have become a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, subject to the eight-year membership service requirement, as applicable in those sections. For purposes of Sections 25-11-103, 25-11-111, 25-11-114 and 25-11-115, if a member of the system withdrew from state service and received a refund of the amount of the accumulated contributions to the credit of the member in the annuity savings account before July 1, 2011, and the person reenters state service and becomes a member of the system again on or after July 1, 2011, and repays all or part of the amount received as a refund and interest in order to receive creditable service for service rendered before July 1, 2011, the member shall be considered to have become a member of the system on or after July 1, 2011.

“Membership service” means service as an employee in a covered position rendered while a contributing member of the retirement system.

“Position” means any office or any employment in the state service, or two (2) or more of them, the duties of which call for services to be rendered by one (1) person, including positions jointly employed by federal and state agencies administering federal and state funds. The employer shall determine upon initial employment and during the course of employment of an employee who does not meet the criteria for coverage in the Public Employees’ Retirement System based on the position held, whether the employee is or becomes eligible for coverage in the Public Employees’ Retirement System based upon any other employment in a covered agency or political subdivision. If or when the employee meets the eligibility criteria for coverage in the other position, then the employer must withhold contributions and report wages from the noncovered position in accordance with the provisions for reporting of earned compensation. Failure to deduct and report those contributions shall not relieve the employee or employer of liability thereof. The board shall adopt such rules and regulations as necessary to implement and enforce this provision.

“Prior service” means:

For persons who became members of the system before July 1, 2007, service rendered before February 1, 1953, for which credit is allowable under Sections 25-11-105 and 25-11-109, and which shall allow prior service for any person who is now or becomes a member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System and who does contribute to the system for a minimum period of four (4) years.

For persons who became members of the system on or after July 1, 2007, service rendered before February 1, 1953, for which credit is allowable under Sections 25-11-105 and 25-11-109, and which shall allow prior service for any person who is now or becomes a member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System and who does contribute to the system for a minimum period of eight (8) years.

“Regular interest” means interest compounded annually at such a rate as determined by the board in accordance with Section 25-11-121.

“Retirement allowance” means an annuity for life as provided in this article, payable each year in twelve (12) equal monthly installments beginning as of the date fixed by the board. The retirement allowance shall be calculated in accordance with Section 25-11-111. However, any spouse who received a spouse retirement benefit in accordance with Section 25-11-111(d) before March 31, 1971, and those benefits were terminated because of eligibility for a social security benefit, may again receive his or her spouse retirement benefit from and after making application with the board of trustees to reinstate the spouse retirement benefit.

“Retroactive service” means service rendered after February 1, 1953, for which credit is allowable under Section 25-11-105(b) and Section 25-11-105(k).

“System” means the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi established and described in Section 25-11-101.

“State” means the State of Mississippi or any political subdivision thereof or instrumentality of the state.

“State service” means all offices and positions of trust or employment in the employ of the state, or any political subdivision or instrumentality of the state, that elect to participate as provided by Section 25-11-105(f), including the position of elected or fee officials of the counties and their deputies and employees performing public services or any department, independent agency, board or commission thereof, and also includes all offices and positions of trust or employment in the employ of joint state and federal agencies administering state and federal funds and service rendered by employees of the public schools. Effective July 1, 1973, all nonprofessional public school employees, such as bus drivers, janitors, maids, maintenance workers and cafeteria employees, shall have the option to become members in accordance with Section 25-11-105(b), and shall be eligible to receive credit for services before July 1, 1973, provided that the contributions and interest are paid by the employee in accordance with that section; in addition, the county or municipal separate school district may pay the employer contribution and pro rata share of interest of the retroactive service from available funds. “State service” shall not include the President of the Mississippi Lottery Corporation and personnel employed by the Mississippi Lottery Corporation. From and after July 1, 1998, retroactive service credit shall be purchased at the actuarial cost in accordance with Section 25-11-105(b).

“Withdrawal from service” or “termination from service” means complete severance of employment in the state service of any member by resignation, dismissal or discharge.

The masculine pronoun, wherever used, includes the feminine pronoun.

For purposes of this article, the term “political subdivision” shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 25-11-5 and shall also include public charter schools.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-12; Laws, 1952, ch. 299, § 12; Laws, 1958, ch. 547, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 453, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 578, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 478, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 450, § 5; Laws, 1977, ch. 450, § 2; Laws, 1980, ch. 481, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 307, § 6; Laws, 1984, ch. 496, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 504, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 513, § 7; brought forward without change, Laws, 1987, ch. 345, § 7; Laws, 1989, ch. 583, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 513, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 576, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 617, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 601, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 624, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 472, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 544, § 17; Laws, 2000, ch. 628, § 6; Laws, 2002, ch. 627, § 5; Laws, 2004, ch. 561, § 4; Laws, 2007, ch. 407, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 359, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 389, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 528, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 414, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 397, § 3; Laws, 2016, ch. 420, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 2, § 49, eff from and after September 1, 2018.

§ 25-11-105.
Membership.

I. THOSE WHO ARE ELIGIBLE FOR MEMBERSHIP

The membership of this retirement system shall be composed as follows:

(i) All persons who become employees in the state service after January 31, 1953, and whose wages are subject to payroll taxes and are lawfully reported on IRS Form W-2, except those specifically excluded, or as to whom election is provided in Articles 1 and 3, shall become members of the retirement system as a condition of their employment.

From and after July 1, 2002, any individual who is employed by a governmental entity to perform professional services shall become a member of the system if the individual is paid regular periodic compensation for those services that is subject to payroll taxes, is provided all other employee benefits and meets the membership criteria established by the regulations adopted by the board of trustees that apply to all other members of the system; however, any active member employed in such a position on July 1, 2002, will continue to be an active member for as long as they are employed in any such position.

All persons who become employees in the state service after January 31, 1953, except those specifically excluded or as to whom election is provided in Articles 1 and 3, unless they file with the board before the lapse of sixty (60) days of employment or sixty (60) days after the effective date of the cited articles, whichever is later, on a form prescribed by the board, a notice of election not to be covered by the membership of the retirement system and a duly executed waiver of all present and prospective benefits that would otherwise inure to them on account of their participation in the system, shall become members of the retirement system; however, no credit for prior service will be granted to members who became members of the system before July 1, 2007, until they have contributed to Article 3 of the retirement system for a minimum period of at least four (4) years, or to members who became members of the system on or after July 1, 2007, until they have contributed to Article 3 of the retirement system for a minimum period of at least eight (8) years. Those members shall receive credit for services performed before January 1, 1953, in employment now covered by Article 3, but no credit shall be granted for retroactive services between January 1, 1953, and the date of their entry into the retirement system, unless the employee pays into the retirement system both the employer’s and the employee’s contributions on wages paid him during the period from January 31, 1953, to the date of his becoming a contributing member, together with interest at the rate determined by the board of trustees. Members reentering after withdrawal from service shall qualify for prior service under the provisions of Section 25-11-117. From and after July 1, 1998, upon eligibility as noted above, the member may receive credit for such retroactive service provided:

The member shall furnish proof satisfactory to the board of trustees of certification of that service from the covered employer where the services were performed; and

The member shall pay to the retirement system on the date he or she is eligible for that credit or at any time thereafter before the date of retirement the actuarial cost for each year of that creditable service. The provisions of this subparagraph (ii) shall be subject to the limitations of Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations promulgated under Section 415.

Nothing contained in this paragraph (b) shall be construed to limit the authority of the board to allow the correction of reporting errors or omissions based on the payment of the employee and employer contributions plus applicable interest.

All persons who become employees in the state service after January 31, 1953, and who are eligible for membership in any other retirement system shall become members of this retirement system as a condition of their employment, unless they elect at the time of their employment to become a member of that other system.

All persons who are employees in the state service on January 31, 1953, and who are members of any nonfunded retirement system operated by the State of Mississippi, or any of its departments or agencies, shall become members of this system with prior service credit unless, before February 1, 1953, they file a written notice with the board of trustees that they do not elect to become members.

All persons who are employees in the state service on January 31, 1953, and who under existing laws are members of any fund operated for the retirement of employees by the State of Mississippi, or any of its departments or agencies, shall not be entitled to membership in this retirement system unless, before February 1, 1953, any such person indicates by a notice filed with the board, on a form prescribed by the board, his individual election and choice to participate in this system, but no such person shall receive prior service credit unless he becomes a member on or before February 1, 1953.

Each political subdivision of the state and each instrumentality of the state or a political subdivision, or both, is authorized to submit, for approval by the board of trustees, a plan for extending the benefits of this article to employees of any such political subdivision or instrumentality. Each such plan or any amendment to the plan for extending benefits thereof shall be approved by the board of trustees if it finds that the plan, or the plan as amended, is in conformity with such requirements as are provided in Articles 1 and 3; however, upon approval of the plan or any such plan previously approved by the board of trustees, the approved plan shall not be subject to cancellation or termination by the political subdivision or instrumentality. No such plan shall be approved unless:

It provides that all services that constitute employment as defined in Section 25-11-5 and are performed in the employ of the political subdivision or instrumentality, by any employees thereof, shall be covered by the plan, with the exception of municipal employees who are already covered by existing retirement plans; however, those employees in this class may elect to come under the provisions of this article;

It specifies the source or sources from which the funds necessary to make the payments required by paragraph (d) of Section 25-11-123 and of paragraph (f)(v)2 and 3 of this section are expected to be derived and contains reasonable assurance that those sources will be adequate for that purpose;

It provides for such methods of administration of the plan by the political subdivision or instrumentality as are found by the board of trustees to be necessary for the proper and efficient administration thereof;

It provides that the political subdivision or instrumentality will make such reports, in such form and containing such information, as the board of trustees may from time to time require;

It authorizes the board of trustees to terminate the plan in its entirety in the discretion of the board if it finds that there has been a failure to comply substantially with any provision contained in the plan, the termination to take effect at the expiration of such notice and on such conditions as may be provided by regulations of the board and as may be consistent with applicable federal law.

1. The board of trustees shall not finally refuse to approve a plan submitted under paragraph (f), and shall not terminate an approved plan without reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing to each political subdivision or instrumentality affected by the board’s decision. The board’s decision in any such case shall be final, conclusive and binding unless an appeal is taken by the political subdivision or instrumentality aggrieved by the decision to the Circuit Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, in accordance with the provisions of law with respect to civil causes by certiorari.

2. Each political subdivision or instrumentality as to which a plan has been approved under this section shall pay into the contribution fund, with respect to wages (as defined in Section 25-11-5), at such time or times as the board of trustees may by regulation prescribe, contributions in the amounts and at the rates specified in the applicable agreement entered into by the board.

3. Every political subdivision or instrumentality required to make payments under paragraph (f)(v)2 of this section is authorized, in consideration of the employees’ retention in or entry upon employment after enactment of Articles 1 and 3, to impose upon its employees, as to services that are covered by an approved plan, a contribution with respect to wages (as defined in Section 25-11-5) not exceeding the amount provided in Section 25-11-123(d) if those services constituted employment within the meaning of Articles 1 and 3, and to deduct the amount of the contribution from the wages as and when paid. Contributions so collected shall be paid into the contribution fund as partial discharge of the liability of the political subdivisions or instrumentalities under paragraph (f)(v)2 of this section. Failure to deduct the contribution shall not relieve the employee or employer of liability for the contribution.

4. Any state agency, school, political subdivision, instrumentality or any employer that is required to submit contribution payments or wage reports under any section of this chapter shall be assessed interest on delinquent payments or wage reports as determined by the board of trustees in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board and delinquent payments, assessed interest and any other amount certified by the board as owed by an employer, may be recovered by action in a court of competent jurisdiction against the reporting agency liable therefor or may, upon due certification of delinquency and at the request of the board of trustees, be deducted from any other monies payable to the reporting agency by any department or agency of the state.

5. Each political subdivision of the state and each instrumentality of the state or a political subdivision or subdivisions that submit a plan for approval of the board, as provided in this section, shall reimburse the board for coverage into the expense account, its pro rata share of the total expense of administering Articles 1 and 3 as provided by regulations of the board.

The board may, in its discretion, deny the right of membership in this system to any class of employees whose compensation is only partly paid by the state or who are occupying positions on a part-time or intermittent basis. The board may, in its discretion, make optional with employees in any such classes their individual entrance into this system.

An employee whose membership in this system is contingent on his own election, and who elects not to become a member, may thereafter apply for and be admitted to membership; but no such employee shall receive prior service credit unless he becomes a member before July 1, 1953, except as provided in paragraph (b).

If any member of this system changes his employment to any agency of the state having an actuarially funded retirement system, the board of trustees may authorize the transfer of the member’s creditable service and of the present value of the member’s employer’s accumulation account and of the present value of the member’s accumulated membership contributions to that other system, provided that the employee agrees to the transfer of his accumulated membership contributions and provided that the other system is authorized to receive and agrees to make the transfer.

If any member of any other actuarially funded system maintained by an agency of the state changes his employment to an agency covered by this system, the board of trustees may authorize the receipt of the transfer of the member’s creditable service and of the present value of the member’s employer’s accumulation account and of the present value of the member’s accumulated membership contributions from the other system, provided that the employee agrees to the transfer of his accumulated membership contributions to this system and provided that the other system is authorized and agrees to make the transfer.

Wherever state employment is referred to in this section, it includes joint employment by state and federal agencies of all kinds.

Employees of a political subdivision or instrumentality who were employed by the political subdivision or instrumentality before an agreement between the entity and the Public Employees’ Retirement System to extend the benefits of this article to its employees, and which agreement provides for the establishment of retroactive service credit, and who became members of the retirement system before July 1, 2007, and have remained contributors to the retirement system for four (4) years, or who became members of the retirement system on or after July 1, 2007, and have remained contributors to the retirement system for eight (8) years, may receive credit for that retroactive service with the political subdivision or instrumentality, provided that the employee and/or employer, as provided under the terms of the modification of the joinder agreement in allowing that coverage, pay into the retirement system the employer’s and employee’s contributions on wages paid the member during the previous employment, together with interest or actuarial cost as determined by the board covering the period from the date the service was rendered until the payment for the credit for the service was made. Those wages shall be verified by the Social Security Administration or employer payroll records. Effective July 1, 1998, upon eligibility as noted above, a member may receive credit for that retroactive service with the political subdivision or instrumentality provided:

The member shall furnish proof satisfactory to the board of trustees of certification of those services from the political subdivision or instrumentality where the services were rendered or verification by the Social Security Administration; and

The member shall pay to the retirement system on the date he or she is eligible for that credit or at any time thereafter before the date of retirement the actuarial cost for each year of that creditable service. The provisions of this subparagraph (ii) shall be subject to the limitations of Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations promulgated under Section 415.

Nothing contained in this paragraph (k) shall be construed to limit the authority of the board to allow the correction of reporting errors or omissions based on the payment of employee and employer contributions plus applicable interest. Payment for that time shall be made beginning with the most recent service. Upon the payment of all or part of the required contributions, plus interest or the actuarial cost as provided above, the member shall receive credit for the period of creditable service for which full payment has been made to the retirement system.

Through June 30, 1998, any state service eligible for retroactive service credit, no part of which has ever been reported, and requiring the payment of employee and employer contributions plus interest, or, from and after July 1, 1998, any state service eligible for retroactive service credit, no part of which has ever been reported to the retirement system, and requiring the payment of the actuarial cost for that creditable service, may, at the member’s option, be purchased in quarterly increments as provided above at the time that its purchase is otherwise allowed.

All rights to purchase retroactive service credit or repay a refund as provided in Section 25-11-101 et seq. shall terminate upon retirement.

II. THOSE WHO ARE NOT ELIGIBLE FOR MEMBERSHIP

The following classes of employees and officers shall not become members of this retirement system, any other provisions of Articles 1 and 3 to the contrary notwithstanding:

Patient or inmate help in state charitable, penal or correctional institutions;

Students of any state educational institution employed by any agency of the state for temporary, part-time or intermittent work;

Participants of Comprehensive Employment and Training Act of 1973 (CETA) being Public Law 93-203, who enroll on or after July l, 1979;

From and after July 1, 2002, individuals who are employed by a governmental entity to perform professional service on less than a full-time basis who do not meet the criteria established in I(a)(ii) of this section.

III. TERMINATION OF MEMBERSHIP

Membership in this system shall cease by a member withdrawing his accumulated contributions, or by a member withdrawing from active service with a retirement allowance, or by a member’s death.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-13; Laws, 1952, ch. 299, § 13; Laws, 1960, ch. 453, § 2; Laws, 1979, ch. 419; Laws, 1980, ch. 481, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 449, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 513, § 3; Laws, 1993, ch. 617, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 601, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 472, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 342, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 627, § 6; Laws, 2004, ch. 561, § 5; Laws, 2007, ch. 407, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 397, § 4; Laws, 2017, ch. 338, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.